Utah statutes.
31A-2-104.   Other employees -- Insurance fraud investigators.

(1)  The department shall employ a chief examiner and such other professional, technical, and clerical employees as necessary to carry out the duties of the department.

(2)  An insurance fraud investigator employed pursuant to Subsection (1) may be designated a special function officer, as defined in Section 53-13-105, by the commissioner, but is not eligible for retirement benefits under the Public Safety Employee's Retirement System.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

